Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-303.06
Claims not barred.

The Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act shall not bar any claim against any person who has acquired any money or real or personal property by means of any deceptive trade practice or unconscionable act listed in section 87-302 or 87-303.01.

Laws 1974, LB 327, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB781, § 7.